Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4027
Real property.

Unless the power of attorney otherwise
provides, language in a power of attorney granting general authority with
respect to real property authorizes the agent to:

(1) Demand, buy, lease,
receive, accept as a gift or as security for an extension of credit, or otherwise
acquire or reject an interest in real property or a right incident to real
property;

(2)
Sell; exchange; convey with or without covenants, representations, or warranties;
quitclaim; release; surrender; retain title for security; encumber; partition;
consent to partitioning; subject to an easement or covenant; subdivide; apply
for zoning or other governmental permits; plat or consent to platting; develop;
grant an option concerning; lease; sublease; contribute to an entity in exchange
for an interest in that entity; or otherwise grant or dispose of an interest
in real property or a right incident to real property;

(3) Pledge or mortgage
an interest in real property or right incident to real property as security
to borrow money or pay, renew, or extend the time of payment of a debt of
the principal or a debt guaranteed by the principal;

(4) Release, assign, satisfy, or
enforce by litigation or otherwise a mortgage, deed of trust, conditional
sales contract, encumbrance, lien, or other claim to real property which exists
or is asserted;

(5)
Manage or conserve an interest in real property or a right incident to real
property owned or claimed to be owned by the principal, including:

(a) Insuring against
liability or casualty or other loss;

(b) Obtaining or regaining possession of or protecting
the interest or right by litigation or otherwise;

(c) Paying, assessing, compromising,
or contesting taxes or assessments or applying for and receiving refunds in
connection with them; and

(d)
Purchasing supplies, hiring assistance or labor, and making repairs or alterations
to the real property;

(6)
Use, develop, alter, replace, remove, erect, or install structures or other
improvements upon real property in or incident to which the principal has,
or claims to have, an interest or right;

(7) Participate in a reorganization with respect to
real property or an entity that owns an interest in or right incident to real
property and receive, and hold, and act with respect to stocks and bonds or
other property received in a plan of reorganization, including:

(a) Selling or otherwise
disposing of them;

(b)
Exercising or selling an option, right of conversion, or similar right with
respect to them; and

(c)
Exercising any voting rights in person or by proxy;

(8) Change the form of title of
an interest in or right incident to real property; and

(9) Dedicate to public
use, with or without consideration, easements or other real property in which
the principal has, or claims to have, an interest.

Laws 2012, LB1113, § 27.